nlp3/english.affix
flag *P:
    [^AEIOU]Y	>	-Y,INESS	# As in cloudy > cloudiness
    [AEIOU]Y	>	NESS		# As in gray > grayness
    [^Y]	>	NESS		# As in late > lateness

flag *M:
    .		>	'S		# As in dog > dog's
