nlp3/english.dict
Abilene/M
abstractor/MS
abstruse/PY
accretion/MS
accumulative/PY
activator/MS
acute/PRTY
Adelaide/M
admonishment/MS
adult/MPSY
advisor/MS
aficionada/MS
aged/PY
Aida/M
airtight/P
Aitken/M
Aldrich/M
Alice/M
alleviator/MS
allusive/PY
Al/MR
Alvin/M
ambitious/PY
Amherst/M
Anabaptist/MS
analogous/PY
Andorra/M
Anglophobia/M
another/M
antimedieval/MS
apart/P
aphid/MS
Appleton/M
apt/IPUY
Aquila/M
architecture/MS
armament/MS
arsenal/MS
articulate/DGNPSVXY
ascetic/MS
assembly/MS
Assyriology/M
astute/PY
Atlantic/M
attorney/MS
auditor/MS
austere/PY
autocrat/MS
away/P
axion/MS
backdrop/MS
bag/MS
bald/GPRY
ballerina/MS
bangle/MS
Barbour/M
bareheaded/P
barrel/MS
basement/MS
bathrobe/MS
bayonet/DGMS
bearish/PY
beaver/MS
Beelzebub/M
bellhop/MS
beneficial/PY
Benelux/M
Bergstrom/M
Betsey/M
big/PY
biker/MS
bird/MRS
bit/GMRSZ
black/DGNPRSTXY
Blaine/M
bleary/PY
bloke/MS
blue/DGPRSTY
blueprint/DGMS
bobwhite/MS
bonanza/MS
bookish/PY
booster/MS
boulevard/MS
bountiful/PY
Boylston/M
bratty/P
Brazilian/M
Brest/M
brigand/MS
brilliant/PY
brooch/MS
brown/DGJPRSTY
brute/MS
buggy/MS
bumpy/PRY
bunker/DGMS
Burlington/M
butler/MS
cabbage/DGMS
cagey/P
Caitlin/M
calm/DGPRSTY
calorie/MS
canary/MS
cantaloupe/MS
capricious/PY
carbohydrate/MS
Carl/M
carrot/MS
caste/DGHJMRSZ
causation/MS
cavalier/PY
cello/MS
chain/DGMS
changeful/PY
chaplain/MS
Chatsworth/M
cheeky/PRY
Cherie/M
childlike/P
children/M
chopper/MS
chronology/MS
chummy/PRY
circumlocution/MS
clannish/PY
classroom/MS
cliff/MS
cliquish/PY
cloister/DGMS
clunky/PY
cockfight/GMS
coffer/MS
cold/PRSTY
Colombo/M
comedian/MS
committee/MS
commodious/IPY
compassionate/PY
compilation/AMS
composed/PY
concertgoer/MS
conclusive/IPY
confirmation/MS
conical/PY
Conrad/M
conservative/PSY
constraint/MS
contemptible/P
continuance/MS
contrite/NPY
Convair/M
cooperator/MS
cordial/PY
cornfield/MS
costly/PRT
cottontail/MS
couple/DGJMRSZ
cowboy/MS
cozy/PRSY
crazy/PRSTY
creature/MSY
crisp/PRSY
cropland/MS
crumbly/PR
cryptogram/MS
Cupertino/M
curious/PRTY
customary/PY
cutter/MS
Dahomey/M
Dante/M
dapper/PY
day/MSY
deadly/PRT
decade/MS
deceivable/P
Dee/M
defective/PSY
DeKalb/M
delectable/P
delirious/PY
dell/MS
Denny/M
dependable/P
depot/MS
desirous/PY
desktop/MS
detached/PY
development/MS
devious/PY
dialogue/MS
dictatorial/PY
Diebold/M
diligent/PY
Dillon/M
direction/MS
disadvantaged/P
disc/MS
discrete/NPXY
dismal/PY
disposition/MS
disreputable/P
distinct/IPVY
ditch/DGMRS
Dodd/M
dogged/PY
Dominique/M
donnish/PY
Dorset/M
dovish/P
drawback/MS
dreadful/PY
drop/MS
droughty/P
Duchamp/M
Dunedin/M
durable/PS
Dwyer/M
earthly/PU
easement/MS
edict/MS
effective/PSY
Ehrlich/M
elaborate/DGNPSVXY
electroencephalogram/MS
Elise/M
Ely/M
emission/AMS
emotionless/P
endnote/MS
entertainment/MS
envious/PY
epistle/MRS
Erskine/M
estimable/P
Euclid/M
eventful/PY
evolute/MNSX
exceptional/PY
executable/MS
exhaustive/PY
experiment/DGMRSZ
expert/MPSY
extensive/PY
exterior/MSY
facile/PY
facility/MS
fair/DGPRSTY
falsehood/MS
fanatical/P
fastidious/PY
father/DGMSY
faultless/PY
feeble/PRT
Fenwick/M
ferocious/PY
Feynman/M
fickle/P
filthy/PRTY
finale/MS
fishermen/M
fit/PSY
flawless/PY
fledgling/MS
floppy/MPRSY
flutist/MS
foggy/PRTY
football/DMRSZ
footsore/P
foresighted/PY
formalism/MS
formidable/P
fountain/MS
fractious/PY
Frankfurt/M
freewheeling/P
friction/MS
frigid/PY
Frost/M
frozen/PY
funeral/MS
furious/PRY
gainless/P
galley/MS
Gary/M
gastight/P
gelatinous/PY
gem/MS
genome/MS
gentlemanly/P
germ/MNS
gigantic/P
Gillian/M
Giuliano/M
glassy/PRSY
glutinous/PY
goal/MS
Goldstein/M
gorgeous/PY
Gould/M
granary/MS
grand/PRSTY
greasy/PRY
Greek/MS
grim/DGPY
Grimsrud/M
groundless/PY
grub/MS
guileless/PY
gutsy/PR
gymnasium/MS
half/P
halyard/MS
hardfisted/P
hardship/MS
harmonical/PY
haze/DGMRS
hazy/PRTY
heavenly/P
Helga/M
helpful/PY
herring/MS
hilltop/MS
hirsute/P
Holcomb/M
homeless/P
hopeful/PSY
horizon/MS
hotheaded/PY
Hubbell/M
humble/DGPRST
hype/DMRS
identical/PY
illiberal/PY
illusion/MS
imaginable/P
immediate/PY
impassive/PY
impermeable/P
impolitic/PY
impressionable/P
inanimate/PY
inclination/MS
incomplete/NPY
incredible/P
indescribable/P
indissoluble/P
ineffable/P
inexorable/P
inflexible/P
information/MS
inheritable/P
innate/PY
inquisitive/PY
insecurity/MS
insidious/PY
intellectual/MPSY
intelligence/MRS
interesting/PY
internship/MS
intricate/PY
invasive/P
invitation/MS
irate/PY
irremediable/P
irrevocable/P
isotope/MS
jab/MS
jamboree/M
Jeanette/M
jejune/PY
jewel/MRSZ
joyless/PY
Juan/M
Kahn/M
Kenney/M
Kimberly/M
kindly/PR
knotmeter/MS
knowledgeable/P
lair/MS
lanky/PRY
lass/MS
lavish/DGPY
leadership/MS
lean/DGJPRSTY
leopard/MS
lewd/PY
life/MRZ
light/DGMNPRSTXYZ
lilting/PY
linguist/MS
listless/PY
live/DGHJPRSTYZ
lockup/MS
lonely/PRTY
lopsided/PY
lot/MS
loutish/PY
lowly/PRTY
luminous/PY
lusty/PRY
lynx/MS
Madagascar/M
magneto/MS
maker/MS
malcontented/PY
Malta/M
manifest/DGPSY
manifold/MPRSY
maple/MS
mariner/MS
marsupial/MS
massive/PY
mat/DGJMRS
Maxtor/M
Mcclellan/M
McElroy/M
McKee/M
McNaughton/M
mealymouthed/PY
meek/PRTY
megapixel/MS
merciful/PY
metadata/M
meticulous/PY
Microport/M
minimalist/MS
minute/DGPRSTY
miserly/P
missile/MS
modifiable/P
Mona/M
monotonous/PY
Moran/M
mountainous/PY
Mozart/M
muggy/PRY
musky/PRS
Muslim/MS
naive/PRY
Natalie/M
natural/PSY
necessitous/PY
nervous/PY
Netscape/M
niggardly/P
node/MS
nonsensical/PY
notebook/MS
noxious/PY
objectionable/P
objection/MS
obnoxious/PY
obtrusive/PUY
offender/MS
offhanded/PY
omnivorous/PY
opening/MS
openmouthed/PY
ordinary/PSY
origami/M
outcrop/MS
outgoing/PS
overeager/PY
Pabst/M
painful/PY
pan/MS
papery/P
participant/MS
patchy/PRY
patty/MS
peevish/PY
peg/MS
perceptive/PY
perky/PRY
Perle/M
perspicuous/PY
pestiferous/PY
Phillip/M
pickpocket/MS
picky/PR
pious/PY
pistol/MS
placid/PY
platform/MS
pleasing/PY
plump/DNPRY
polarimeter/MS
polite/PRTY
porch/MS
positive/PSY
PPP/M
practical/PY
precipitate/DGNPSVY
prejudicial/PY
prerogative/DMS
presumptuous/PY
priestly/P
procrastinator/MS
prodigious/PY
prolific/P
prophet/MS
prosperous/PY
pseudonymous/PY
psychopath/MS
punctual/PY
purposive/PY
pushpin/MS
quantitative/PY
quartet/MS
quiet/DGNPRSTXY
Rae/M
rambunctious/PY
rapt/PY
rapture/DGMS
raw/PRSTY
receptacle/MS
receptive/PY
reflection/MS
reflexive/PY
regretful/PY
relativity/M
remediable/P
replete/NP
repression/MS
resentful/PY
respectful/PY
restrictive/PY
retailer/MS
rhythm/MS
right/DGNPRSY
rite/DMS
ritzy/PR
Rodney/M
rootless/P
Rosenberg/M
rounded/P
Rozelle/M
ruinous/PY
sadist/MS
safe/PRSTY
salubrious/PY
Sanborn/M
saponaceous/P
sari/MS
Saxony/M
scant/PY
Schafer/M
schoolroom/MS
Scotland/M
scruffy/PR
seaworthy/P
sector/DGMS
seductive/PY
self/P
sentry/MS
separable/IP
sexless/PY
shamefaced/P
Shamir/M
shiftless/PY
shopkeeper/MS
shrewish/PY
Siegel/M
significative/PY
sincere/PTY
skew/DGPRSZ
skier/MS
slatternly/P
slight/DGPRSTY
slovenly/P
slur/MS
smoky/PRSY
snide/PRTY
snug/PSY
software/M
sole/DGPSY
soothing/PY
soulful/PY
soviet/MS
special/PSY
Spencer/M
spirited/PY
spontaneous/PY
sprightly/PR
spyware/MS
squashy/PRY
stalwart/PY
Stanhope/M
statutory/PY
stereogram/MS
sterling/PY
stodgy/PRY
stowaway/MS
straitlaced/PY
strict/PRTY
stupendous/PY
Sturbridge/M
subconscious/PY
subscription/MS
subtile/PRTY
suggestive/PY
Sumatran/M
superb/PY
superstitious/PY
superuser/MS
surface/DGPRSZ
swampland/MS
swanky/PRY
swimmy/PRY
tabernacle/DGMS
tall/PRT
tariff/MS
taut/NPY
technique/MS
temerarious/PY
tenderhearted/PY
tensor/MS
testy/PRY
Thea/M
thin/PRSTY
thriftless/PY
throng/GMS
timeless/PY
tireless/PY
tit/MS
tonometer/MS
torrid/PY
tractor/AMS
transparency/MS
transparent/PY
tricksy/PR
trinket/DMRS
truehearted/P
Tuesday/MS
turbid/PY
tympanum/M
umbrageous/PY
unbounded/P
uncommon/PY
undeniable/P
unfaithful/PY
unhappy/PRTY
uniprocessor/MS
unjust/PY
unmitigated/PY
unselfconscious/P
untoward/PY
uproarious/PY
uxorious/PY
vale/MS
valuable/PS
Veda/M
venerable/P
verdurous/P
vicissitude/MS
victorious/PY
Vincent/M
visible/IP
vocation/MS
voluntary/IPY
waitress/MS
watchword/MS
waterish/P
weighty/PRY
wellwisher/MS
Wightman/M
willful/PY
woebegone/P
Wolfe/M
workstation/MS
worrisome/PY
yeast/MS
zealous/PY
Zimmerman/M
